Colorado, session 2026A, HB1383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-83-406, add (4) as
follows:
8-83-406. Employment support and job retention services
program cash fund - created.
(4) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 8-83-407 as
follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

8-83-407. Repeal of part.
This part 4 is repealed, effective September 1, 2029 JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of labor and employment for use
by the division of employment and training are adjusted as follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation for the employment support and
job retention services program cash fund created in section 8-83-406 (1)(a),
C.R.S., is decreased by $250,000; and
(b) The reappropriated funds appropriation from the employment
support and job retention services program cash fund created in section
8-83-406 (1)(a), C.R.S., for the employment support and job retention
services program is decreased by $250,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of labor and employment for use by the division of employment and training
for the employment support and job retention services program cash fund
is less than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1)(a) of
this section;
(b) The amount of the reappropriated funds appropriation from the
employment support and job retention services program cash fund created
in section 8-83-406 (1)(a), C.R.S., made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of labor and
employment for use by the division of employment and training for the
employment support and job retention services program is less than the
amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of labor and
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1383

employment for use by the division of employment and training for:
(I) The employment support and job retention services program cash
fund; or
(II) The employment support and job retention services program.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 3 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 3 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1383

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1383